Maryland, session 2025, HB0746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1604.
(a) In this section, “eligible transferor district” means an election district in which
the total number of Class B and Class D licenses, excluding exception licenses, is 10% or
greater than the total number of Class B and Class D licenses that are allowed in an
election district based on the rule of the Board that limits the total number of licenses
available in an election district by population.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Board may
approve the transfer of a Class B or Class D license in existence in an eligible transferor
district on June 1, [2022] 2025, to another election district if:
– 1 –

Ch. 815 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the approval occurs anytime from June 1, [2022] 2025, to May
31, [2025] 2028, both inclusive; and
(ii) prior to the transfer, the number of licenses in existence in the
election district to which the license is to be transferred is not greater than 25% more than
the number of licenses that would otherwise exist in that election district, based on the rule
of the Board that limits the total number of licenses available in an election district by
population.
(2) (i) The Board may not authorize the transfer of more than five Class
B or Class D licenses in existence on June 1, [2022] 2025, in total under this section.
(ii) Not more than two licenses may be transferred under this
subsection into any single election district.
(3) (i) When the Board receives an application to transfer a license
under this section, the Board shall notify the county Department of Economic and
Workforce Development.
(ii) 1. This subparagraph applies when the license holder owns
the property from which the license is to be transferred.
2. The application to transfer a license shall include
information on the status of the real property associated with the license to be transferred
and any plans for disposition and future use of the property after the transfer of the license.
3. Except as provided in subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph,
the Board shall deny a transfer under this section if it determines, based on an assessment
provided by the county Department of Economic and Workforce Development, that:
A. the applicant has not demonstrated that there is an
appropriate future use of the property from which the license is to be transferred after the
transfer; or
B. the transfer will result in significant negative economic
impact to the community that surrounds the property from which the license is to be
transferred.
(iii) 1. This subparagraph applies when the license holder has no
ownership in the property from which the license is to be transferred.
2. The county Department of Economic and Workforce
Development may submit a letter to the Board regarding the economic impact the transfer
of the license will have on the community that surrounds the property from which the
license is to be transferred.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 815
3. The Board may deny a transfer under this section based
on the letter received in accordance with subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, unless
the Board finds that the applicant has undertaken a good faith effort to facilitate a future
use of the property by advising the property owner of the intention to transfer the license
to another location.
4. The applicant may submit information to the Board in
support of the transfer of the license.
(iv) The Board may waive the requirement under subparagraph (ii)3
of this paragraph if, with the concurrence of the county Department of Economic and
Workforce Development, the Board finds that the license holder has undertaken good faith
efforts to facilitate a future use of the property and mitigate any negative economic impacts
to the surrounding community.
(c) (6) A Class B or D license transferred under subsection [(a)] (B) of this
section or a Class B Service Bar (SB) license issued under this subsection may not
thereafter be transferred from the licensed premises or converted to another class of license.
(e) (2) Subject to the 25% allowance authorized in subsection [(a)(1)(ii)]
(B)(1)(II) of this section, the Board shall consider a license transferred under this section
to be a regular license and not an exception license for determining the total number of
licenses available in an election district based on the rule of the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –